Delaware, session 153, HB447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 17, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1703B. Child care affordability initiatives. (a) The Interagency Resource Management Committee (IRMC) shall coordinate planning, program development, and funding related to child care affordability initiatives, including voluntary cost-sharing partnerships between the State, employers, community sponsors, and families, intended to expand access to licensed child care and support workforce participation. (b) The IRMC shall establish guidelines, eligibility criteria, enrollment procedures, and payment methodologies for child care cost-sharing initiatives with the goal of minimizing the administrative burden of participation for families and child care providers. (c) The IRMC may contract for administration, outreach, eligibility verification, payment processing, technical assistance, or other program functions necessary to implement child care affordability initiatives. (d) The IRMC may use funds appropriated by the State for this purpose, as well as federal, philanthropic, or other available funds for the implementation of child care affordability initiatives.